Tennessee, session 114, HB1991.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-5-106, is amended by adding the
following to the end of the section:
Copies of the annual report may be provided in electronic format.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1991
011479
- 1 -